Oklahoma, session 2025, SB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13A-103. A. 1. The general election of members of the
board of education of every school district and technology center
school district shall be conducted on the first second Tuesday of
April November of each odd-numbered year, and on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday of November in each even-numbered year.
2. The primary election of members of the board of education of
every school district and technology center school district, if
necessary, shall be conducted on the second Tuesday in February
September of each odd-numbered year, except in any year when a
Presidential Preferential Primary is held in February, then the
ENGR. S. B. NO. 6 Page 1

elec tion shall be held on the same day as the Presidential
Preferential Primary and on the fourth Tuesday of August in each
even-numbered year.
3. If only two candidates qualify to have their names appear on
the ballot, the names of both candidates shall appear on the ballot
at the board of education general election.
4. If more than two candidates qualify to have their names
appear on the ballot, the names of all such candidates shall appear
on the ballot at the board of education primary election. A
candidate receiving more than fifty percent (50%) of the votes cast
in the board of education primary election shall be elected to the
office. If no candidate receives more than fifty percent (50%) of
the votes cast in the board of education primary election, then the
two candidates with the highest number of votes shall appear on the
ballot at the board of education general election.
B. Elections on the question of making a levy or levies for
schools under Section 9, Section 9B or Section 10 of Article X of
the Oklahoma Constitution shall be held on the second Tuesday in
February of each year, except in any year when a Presidential
Preferential Primary is held in February, then the election shall be
held on the same day as the Presidential Preferential Primary.
C. The board of education of every school district or
technology center school district may call a special election for
the purpose of voting on any matter or question authorized by law.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 6 Page 2

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 13A-105, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 13A-105. Candidates for member of the board of
education of every school district or technology center school
district shall file declarations of candidacy in the same place and
with the same officials as candidates for county office. The
declaration of candidacy to be signed by the candidate shall have an
attachment to be signed by the candidate listing the requirements of
a candidate for election or reelection to a school board as set
forth in Sections 13A-106 and 5-105a of this title and Sections 5-
110, 5-110.1, and 5-113 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
the candidate shall swear or affirm that he or she is eligible to
run for the office or serve in the office if elected. Candidates
shall file no earlier than 8:00 a.m. on the first Monday second
Wednesday in December April through no later than 5:00 p.m. on the
following Wednesday next succeeding Friday. For school districts
and technology center school districts located in more than one
county, filing may be either in the county wherein supervision of
the district is located or in the county where the candidate
resides.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



ENGR. S. B. NO. 6 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 6 Page 4